Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB70.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 7A.220 (Effective January 1, 2027) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The Public Pension Oversight Board shall be composed of the following twenty-
five (25)[twenty-three (23)] members:
(a) 1. Five (5)[Four (4)] members of the General Assembly appointed by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, one (1) of whom shall be the
chair or a vice chair of the House Standing Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and one (1) of whom shall be the chair or
a vice chair of the House Standing Committee on State Government;
and
2. Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives, each of whom shall be selected to ensure
that representation on the board by House members of the General
Assembly is in closer proportion to the representation of each political
party in the House of Representatives.
The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be appointed in
January of each odd-numbered year for a two (2) year term, and the Speaker
shall designate one (1) as co-chair of the board;
(b) 1. Five (5)[Four (4)] members of the General Assembly appointed by the
President of the Senate, one (1) of whom shall be the chair or a vice
chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
and one (1) of whom shall be the chair or a vice chair of the Senate
Standing Committee on State & Local Government; and
2. Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the President
of the Senate, each of whom shall be selected to ensure that
Page 1 of 6
BR168100.100 - 1681 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1681
representation on the board by Senate members of the General
Assembly is in closer proportion to the representation of each political
party in the Senate.
The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be appointed in
January of each odd-numbered year for a two (2) year term, and the President
shall designate one (1) as co-chair of the board;
(c) Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Minority Floor
Leader of the Senate in January of each odd-numbered year for a two (2) year
term;
(d) Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Minority Floor
Leader of the House of Representatives appointed in January of each odd-
numbered year for a two (2) year term;
(e) One (1) individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
who shall be certified as a chartered financial analyst (CFA) with at least ten
(10) years of investment experience or who shall possess at least ten (10)
years of retirement experience as defined by subsection (2) of this section;
(f) One (1) individual appointed by the President of the Senate, who shall be
certified as a chartered financial analyst (CFA) with at least ten (10) years of
investment experience or who shall possess at least ten (10) years of
retirement experience as defined by subsection (2) of this section;
(g) The state budget director or his or her designee;
(h) The Auditor of Public Accounts or his or her designee;
(i) The Attorney General or his or her designee;[ and]
(j) The State Treasurer or his or her designee; and
(k) One (1) individual[Two (2) individuals] appointed by the Governor, who[one
(1) of whom] shall:
1. Be certified as a chartered financial analyst (CFA) with at least ten (10)
Page 2 of 6
BR168100.100 - 1681 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1681
years of investment experience ; or[and one (1) of whom shall ]
2. Possess at least ten (10) years of retirement experience as defined by
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For purposes of this section, "retirement experience" means:
(a) Experience in retirement or pension plan management;
(b) A certified public accountant with relevant experience in retirement or
pension plan accounting;
(c) An actuary with relevant experience in retirement or pension plan consulting;
(d) An attorney licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth of Kentucky with
relevant experience in retirement or pension plans;[ or]
(e) A current or former university professor whose primary area of emphasis is
economics or finance; or
(f) A former elected official with relevant experience in retirement or pension
plan management or policy.
(3) Individuals appointed under subsection (1)(e), (f), and (k)[(j)] of this section shall
not:
(a) Be a current member of the General Assembly;
(b) Be employed by a state agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or
receiving a contractual payment for services rendered to a state agency of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky that would conflict with his or her service to the
board; or
(c) Serve more than three (3) consecutive four (4) year terms on the board.
(4) Any vacancy which may occur in the membership of the board shall be filled within
thirty (30) days of the occurrence, in the same manner as the original appointment,
and for the balance of the vacated member's term.
(5) Individuals appointed under subsection (1)(e), (f), and (k)[(j)] of this section shall
serve a term of four (4) years.
Page 3 of 6
BR168100.100 - 1681 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1681
Section 2. KRS 7A.255 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding KRS 21.345 to 21.580, 61.661, 61.870 to 61.884, or 161.585 to
the contrary, on or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the
state-administered retirement systems shall collectively file a report with the Public
Pension Oversight Board that shall include the following information for each
member or recipient of a retirement allowance from any of the state-administered
retirement systems:
(a) A unique identification number for each member or recipient that is created
solely for purposes of compiling the report provided by this section and which
shall not be the member's Social Security number or personal identification
number issued by the systems. For individual members or recipients with
multiple accounts in the state-administered retirement systems, all of the state-
administered retirement systems shall use the same unique identification
number;
(b) The system or systems in which the member has an account or from which the
retired member is receiving a monthly retirement allowance;
(c) The status of the member or recipient, including but not limited to whether he
or she is a contributing member, a member who is not currently contributing
to the systems but has not retired, a retired member, a beneficiary, or a retired
member who has returned to work following retirement with an agency
participating in the systems;
(d) If the individual is a retired member or beneficiary, the annualized monthly
retirement allowance that he or she was receiving at the end of the most
recently completed fiscal year; and
(e) If the individual is a member who has not yet retired, the estimated annual
retirement allowance that he or she is eligible to receive at his or her normal
retirement date based upon his or her service credit, final compensation, and
Page 4 of 6
BR168100.100 - 1681 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1681
accumulated account balance at the end of the most recently completed fiscal
year.
Under no circumstances shall the member's name, address, or Social Security
number be included in the information required to be reported to the board by this
section, nor shall the unique identification number established by subsection (1) of
this section be capable of being linked to a specific member's retirement account
with a state-administered retirement system.
(2) On or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the state-
administered retirement systems shall report to the Public Pension Oversight Board
the percentage of system assets and managers for which fees and commissions are
being reported in accordance with KRS 21.540(4)(m), 61.645(19)(i), and
161.250(4)(i). This subsection shall apply on a fiscal year basis beginning on or
after July 1, 2017.
(3) On or before November 15, 2017, the state-administered retirement systems shall
tender to the Public Pension Oversight Board a copy of their board-adopted
investment procurement policy along with certification from the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet that the investment procurement policy meets
or does not meet the best practices for investment management procurement. If the
board amends its investment procurement policy, it shall tender a copy of its
amended investment procurement policy to the Public Pension Oversight Board
within sixty (60) days of adoption along with certification from the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet that the policy meets or does not meet the best
practices for investment management procurement.
(4) (a) On or before November 15 following the close of each fiscal year, the
Kentucky Public Pensions Authority shall report to the Public Pension
Oversight Board the number of recipients[individuals] and total payments to
[members]recipients who are receiving a monthly retirement allowance due
Page 5 of 6
BR168100.100 - 1681 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1681
to a member[become]:
1. Becoming totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in
line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or 78.510;
2. Becoming[or become] disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621;
3. Dying as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS
16.505 or 78.510; or
4. Dying as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621.
(b) The data shall be broken down by:
1. System;
2. Benefit type, either disablement or death; and
3. Retirement position type, including nonhazardous positions,
hazardous positions, and, in the case of disablement,[ and for
recipients who are drawing a benefit from the disablement of a
hazardous member, a nonhazardous member who worked in a]
nonhazardous positions[position] that could be certified as [a ]hazardous
positions[position] based upon KRS 61.592 or 78.5520[, and a
nonhazardous member who worked in a nonhazardous position that
could not be certified as a hazardous position based upon KRS 61.592].
(5) On or before November 15, 2023, and on or before November 15 every fourth year
thereafter, the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Kentucky Public
Pensions Authority shall jointly report to the Public Pension Oversight Board on the
costs and effectiveness of the program established by KRS 16.583(2)(b)2. and
16.584.
Section 3. Section 1 of this Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 6 of 6
BR168100.100 - 1681 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed